Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1788
Interest rate.

The interest rates on loans shall be determined by the board of directors, except that the rate shall not exceed eighteen percent per annum on the unpaid balance of the loan. The board may also authorize any refund of interest on such classes of loans under such conditions as it prescribes.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 88.